Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.784

[Art. 131] Perjury.

Any person subject to this code who in a judicial proceeding or in a course of justice conducted under this code wilfully and corruptly gives, upon a lawful oath or in any form allowed by law to be substituted for an oath, any false testimony material to the issue or matter of inquiry is guilty of perjury and shall be punished as a court martial may direct.

[ 1963 c 220 s 115.]